Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
6. DISSOCIATION

[§425E-601] Dissociation as a limited
partner. (a) A person shall not have a right to dissociate as a
limited partner before the termination of the limited partnership.

(b) A person shall be dissociated from a
limited partnership as a limited partner upon the occurrence of any of the
following events:

(1) The limited partnership's having notice of the
person's express will to withdraw as a limited partner or on a later date
specified by the person;

(2) An event agreed to in the partnership agreement
as causing the person's dissociation as a limited partner;

(3) The person's expulsion as a limited partner
pursuant to the partnership agreement;

(4) The person's expulsion as a limited partner by
the unanimous consent of the other partners if:

(A) It is unlawful to carry on the limited
partnership's activities with the person as a limited partner;

(B) There has been a transfer of all of the
person's transferable interest in the limited partnership, other than a
transfer for security purposes, or a court order charging the person's
interest, which has not been foreclosed;

(C) The person is a corporation and, within
ninety days after the limited partnership notifies the person that it will be
expelled as a limited partner because it has filed a certificate of dissolution
or the equivalent, its charter has been revoked, or its right to transact
business has been suspended by the jurisdiction of its incorporation, there is
no revocation of the certificate of dissolution or no reinstatement of its
charter or its right to transact business; or

(D) The person is a limited liability company
or partnership that has been dissolved and whose business is being wound up;

(5) On application by the limited partnership, the
person's expulsion as a limited partner by judicial order because:

(A) The person engaged in wrongful conduct
that adversely and materially affected the limited partnership's activities;

(B) The person wilfully or persistently
committed a material breach of the partnership agreement or of the obligation
of good faith and fair dealing under section 425E-305(b); or

(C) The person engaged in conduct relating to
the limited partnership's activities which makes it not reasonably practicable
to carry on the activities with the person as limited partner;

(6) In the case of a person who is an individual, the
person's death;

(7) In the case of a person that is a trust or is
acting as a limited partner by virtue of being a trustee of a trust,
distribution of the trust's entire transferable interest in the limited
partnership, but not merely by reason of the substitution of a successor
trustee;

(8) In the case of a person that is an estate or is
acting as a limited partner by virtue of being a personal representative of an estate,
distribution of the estate's entire transferable interest in the limited
partnership, but not merely by reason of the substitution of a successor
personal representative;

(9) Termination of a limited partner that is not an
individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust, or
estate; or

(10) The limited partnership's participation in a
conversion or merger under article 11, if the limited partnership:

(A) Is not the converted or surviving entity;
or

(B) Is the converted or surviving entity but,
as a result of the conversion or merger, the person ceases to be a limited
partner. [L 2003, c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next